North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 11. Special Regulations.

§ 7A-95.
Reporting of trials.

Court reporting personnel shall be utilized if available, for the reporting of trials in the superior court. If court reporters are not available in any county, electronic or other mechanical devices shall be provided by the Administrative Office of the Courts upon the request of the senior regular resident superior court judge.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall from time to time investigate the state of the art and techniques of recording testimony, and shall provide such electronic or mechanical devices as are found to be most efficient for this purpose.

If an electronic or other mechanical device is utilized, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the superior court or some person designated by the clerk to operate the device while a trial is in progress, and the clerk shall thereafter preserve the record thus produced, which may be transcribed, as required, by any person designated by the Administrative Office of the Courts. If stenotype, shorthand, or stenomask equipment is used, the original tapes, notes, discs or other records are the property of the State, and the clerk shall keep them in his custody.

Reporting of any trial may be waived by consent of the parties.

Appointment of a reporter or reporters for superior court proceedings in each district or set of districts as defined in G.S. 7A-41.1(a) shall be made by the senior regular resident superior court judge of that district or set of districts. The compensation and allowances of reporters in each such district or set of districts shall be fixed by the senior regular resident superior court judge, within limits determined by the Administrative Officer of the Courts, and paid by the State.

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 377, s. 32.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1969, c. 1190, s. 7; 1971, c. 377, s. 32; 1987, c. 384, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 14.

§ 7A-96.
Court adjourned by sheriff when judge not present.

If the judge of a superior court shall not be present to hold any session of court at the time fixed therefor, he may order the sheriff to adjourn the court to any day certain during the session, and on failure to hear from the judge it shall be the duty of the sheriff to adjourn the court from day to day, unless he shall be sooner informed that the judge for any reason cannot hold the session.

History.

Code, s. 926; 1887, c. 13; 1901, c. 269; Rev., s. 1510; C.S., s. 1448; 1969, c. 1190, s. 49.

§ 7A-97.
Court’s control of argument.

In all trials in the superior courts there shall be allowed two addresses to the jury for the State or plaintiff and two for the defendant, except in capital felonies, when there shall be no limit as to number. The judges of the superior court are authorized to limit the time of argument of counsel to the jury on the trial of actions, civil and criminal as follows: to not less than one hour on each side in misdemeanors and appeals from justices of the peace; to not less than two hours on each side in all other civil actions and in felonies less than capital; in capital felonies, the time of argument of counsel may not be limited otherwise than by consent, except that the court may limit the number of those who may address the jury to three counsel on each side. Where any greater number of addresses or any extension of time are desired, motion shall be made, and it shall be in the discretion of the judge to allow the same or not, as the interests of justice may require. In jury trials the whole case as well of law as of fact may be argued to the jury.

History.

1903, c. 433; Rev., s. 216; C.S., s. 203; 1927, c. 52; 1995, c. 431, s. 7.

§ 7A-98.
Unsworn declarations under penalty of perjury.

Any matter required or permitted to be supported, evidenced, established, or proved in writing under oath or affirmation may, if filed electronically pursuant to rules promulgated by the Supreme Court under

G.S. 7A-49.5

, with like force and effect be supported, evidenced, established, or proved by an unsworn declaration in writing, subscribed by the declarant and dated, that the statement is true under penalty of perjury.

Declarations given pursuant to this section shall be deemed sufficient if given in substantially the following form:

“I declare (or certify, verify, or state) under penalty of perjury under the laws of North Carolina that the foregoing is true and correct. Executed on (date). (Signature).”

Except as otherwise provided by law, this section does not apply to, and such unsworn declarations shall not be deemed sufficient for, any of the following:

Oral testimony.

Oaths of office.

Any statement under oath or affirmation required to be taken before a specified official other than a notary public.

Any will or codicil executed pursuant to

G.S. 31-11.6

.

Any real property deed, contract, or lease requiring an acknowledgment pursuant to

G.S. 47-17

.

History.

2021-47, s. 17(a).

§ 7A-99.

Reserved for future codification purposes.